Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1515
Applicant for
licensure; continuing competency requirements.

An
applicant for licensure as a hearing instrument specialist who has met the
education and examination requirements in section 38-1512, who passed the
examination more than three years prior to the time of application for licensure,
and who is not practicing at the time of application for licensure shall present
proof satisfactory to the department that he or she has within the three years
immediately preceding the application for licensure completed continuing competency
requirements approved by the board pursuant to section 38-145.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 579;

Laws 2009, LB195, § 33.